Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2105.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5112XS (1) 91 as/js S.F. 2105 Section 1. Section 321.492B, Code 2026, is amended to read 1 as follows: 2 321.492B Use of unmanned aerial vehicle for traffic law 3 enforcement prohibited. 4 1. The Except as provided in subsection 2, the state or a 5 political subdivision of the state shall not use an unmanned 6 aerial vehicle for traffic law enforcement. 7 2. A certified law enforcement officer may operate 8 an unmanned aerial vehicle in order to assist other law 9 enforcement officers in apprehending a driver eluding or 10 attempting to elude a pursuing law enforcement vehicle in 11 violation of section 321.279, and may cite the driver for any 12 traffic violations committed during the pursuit. 13 Sec. 2. Section 808.15, Code 2026, is amended to read as 14 follows: 15 808.15 Unmanned aerial vehicle ââ information ââ 16 admissibility. 17 Information obtained as a result of the use of an unmanned 18 aerial vehicle is not admissible as evidence in a criminal or 19 civil proceeding , unless the information is obtained pursuant 20 to the authority of a search warrant when the information 21 obtained is from a location that is viewable from the public 22 navigable airspace or is within public view , or unless if 23 the information is otherwise obtained in a manner that is 24 consistent with state and federal law. 25